particles/conj.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Conjunctions and Subjunctions
! Author: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

Multichar_Symbols +Conj +Subj +Apo

LEXICON Root
CON;
SUB;

LEXICON CON
che		CONEND;
che:ch'	VOCCONEND;
e		CONEND;
e:ed	VOCCONEND;
dentant	CONEND;
ma		CONEND;
mabain	CONEND;
ni		CONEND;
percunter	CONEND;
maindir	CONEND;
nundir	CONEND;
perquai	CONEND;
però	CONEND;
sco		CONEND;
u		CONEND;
ubain	CONEND;
%&		CONEND;

!! Combinations are not part of the morphology:
! tant...sco, u...ni, u...u, ni...ni etc.

LEXICON SUB
che		SUBEND;
che:ch'	VOCSUBEND;
daco SUBEND;
sche	SUBEND;
sche:sch'	VOCSUBEND;
schebain	SUBEND;
cunquai	SUBEND;

!! Combinations are not part of the morphology:
! nua che, cur che, perquai che, etc.

!! Endings with the tags
LEXICON CONEND
+Conj:0	#;

LEXICON VOCCONEND
+Conj+Apo:0	#;

LEXICON SUBEND
+Subj:0	#;

LEXICON VOCSUBEND
+Subj+Apo:0	#;
